Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 3. Search and Rescue Operations

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1991, ch. 210, § 1, and Laws 1991, ch. 248, § 1, both enacted an article 2 of chapter 5 of this title. The provisions enacted by ch. 210, § 1, were redesignated §§

19-5-301

and

19-5-302

and now appear as §§

19-13-301

and

19-13-302

.

§ 19-13-301.
Search and rescue account; created; expenditures.

The search and rescue account is created. Fees identified in W.S.

23-2-101

,

23-2-201

,

31-2-404

,

31-2-409

,

31-2-703

,

41-13-109

and

41-13-110

shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of this account.

Revenues deposited within the search and rescue account shall be expended by the Wyoming office of homeland security to reimburse counties for costs directly incurred in a specific search and rescue operation, subject to W.S.

19-13-302

and rules and regulations adopted by the Wyoming search and rescue council. Expenditures for reimbursement pursuant to this subsection shall receive priority over all other authorized account expenditures. No revenues deposited within the account shall be used to reimburse counties for any salary or benefits normally paid to its employees.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the Wyoming office of homeland security may expend revenues available within the search and rescue account for other search and rescue program purposes including:

Administration of the Wyoming search and rescue program;

Search and rescue training programs for Wyoming search and rescue personnel;

Acquisition and maintenance of search and rescue equipment used in Wyoming;

Development and maintenance of statewide search and rescue overhead teams.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 210, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-201

; 1993, ch. 22, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-301

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2001, ch. 146, § 2; 2005, ch. 169, § 1; ch. 231, § 1; 2013 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 169, § 2, substituted provisions in (b) and (c) to reflect the agency name “emergency management” has been changed to “homeland security.”

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” at the end of the first sentence in (a).

See the conflicting legislation note. This section has been set out incorporating amendments made by both 2005 acts.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “31-2-409,

31-2-703

,” following “31-2-404” in (a).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 19-13-302.
Search and rescue account administration.

Any county sheriff’s office in this state may make a claim on the search and rescue account for reimbursement of costs directly incurred in the performance of search and rescue activities. Any claim made pursuant to this subsection shall be submitted to the Wyoming office of homeland security. Upon receipt, the Wyoming office of homeland security shall transmit the claim to the Wyoming search and rescue council for review and action in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.

The Wyoming search and rescue council shall review and act upon all claims submitted under subsection (a) of this section no later than June 30 following the year in which expenses were incurred for the claim submitted. If there are insufficient funds to pay all approved claims, the Wyoming office of homeland security shall prorate reimbursement among all approved claims. Payments authorized through the Wyoming office of homeland security pursuant to this section shall be paid by the state treasurer by warrant issued by the state auditor upon vouchers signed by the director, Wyoming office of homeland security or his designee.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 146, § 3.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 210, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-202

; 1993, ch. 22, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-302

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2001, ch. 146, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted provisions throughout to reflect the agency name “emergency management” has been changed to “homeland security.”

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

§ 19-13-303.
Search and rescue council; appointment; vacancies; compensation; duties.

The Wyoming search and rescue council is established and shall consist of eleven (11) voting members. The director of the Wyoming office of homeland security or his designee shall serve as a voting member and the permanent executive secretary to the council. The governor shall appoint the remaining ten (10) members to serve four (4) year terms as follows:

Three (3) county sheriffs;

One (1) county commissioner;

One (1) peace officer at large; and

Five (5) other citizens.

Council members appointed by virtue of their elected positions shall resign from the council immediately upon vacating their elected office. Individuals appointed to fill council vacancies shall be appointed for the full term and shall not be appointed to serve the remainder of the unexpired portion of the term. The governor may remove any appointed council member as provided under W.S.

9-1-202

.

Members shall serve without compensation but shall receive mileage and per diem as provided for state employees under W.S.

9-3-102

and

9-3-103

.

The council shall adopt rules and regulations as necessary to administer this article.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 146, § 1; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “The director of the Wyoming office of homeland security or his designee” for “The coordinator of the Wyoming emergency management agency” in (a).

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.